Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 1. Licensing

§ 13-8-101.
Entities deemed foreign building and loan associations.

An association doing or about to do business in this state and having for a part of its title the words, “loan and building association”, “building association”, “savings and loan association” or “building and loan association”, if organized or incorporated in any state or territory other than Wyoming, is a foreign building and loan association subject to the provisions of W.S.

13-8-101

through

13-8-302

.

An association whose stock, savings certificates, trust certificates or bonds are payable by any accumulating fund in regular periodical installments or which, at the time the application is made for such securities, accepts a note for part payment and an assignment of the securities to secure the note and where the note is paid by monthly, quarterly or semiannual payments, is, if organized or incorporated in any state or territory other than Wyoming, a foreign building and loan association subject to the provisions of W.S.

13-8-101

through

13-8-302

.

Foreign associations or companies doing business by collecting monthly installments or dues for the accumulation of funds out of which to loan money to any person on real or personal property fall within the definitions of this section.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 20; 1931, ch. 38, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 17-120; Laws 1933, ch. 110, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 36-123; W.S. 1957, § 13-214; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Effect of foreign statute. —

Colorado statute prohibiting building and loan associations from receiving negotiable instruments with no express authority to pledge securities for extension of business in another state did not nullify its pledge of notes and mortgages on Colorado property with state examiner in Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

§ 13-8-102.
Certificate of need required; exceptions.

A foreign association shall not establish any branch, office or agency within this state for the purpose of selling, delivering, advertising or offering its shares, certificates, bonds or other evidence of deposit or for taking deposits or payment for any security it issues without complying with all provisions of law, and without first obtaining from the state banking commissioner a certificate that he has determined there is a clear need for the foreign building and loan association and that the banks and savings and loan associations doing business in the state do not adequately meet that need. However, any foreign building and loan association which had established and was operating an office, branch or agency within this state prior to February 16, 1963 is not required to obtain the certificate. This section shall not prevent any foreign building and loan association from buying notes or bonds, loaning money and taking mortgages upon real or personal property or other security in this state.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 105, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-214.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-8-103.
Certificate of admission.

An association shall not conduct any business in the state except upon written statement by the state banking commissioner, which shall be filed and preserved in his office, to the effect that the association is solvent and conducting its affairs compatible with prudent business principles. When a statement is made, the state banking board may issue a certificate of admission to the association upon the payment to the state banking commissioner of an amount established by rule and regulation of the commissioner.

Any foreign association which conducts business without a license shall be deemed to be doing business unlawfully.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 17-121; C.S. 1945, § 36-124; W.S. 1957, § 13-236; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1979, ch. 71, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 2; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “an amount established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of fifty dollars ($50.00)” in the second sentence.

Effect of foreign statute. —

Colorado statute prohibiting building and loan associations from receiving negotiable instruments with no express authority to pledge securities for extension of business in another state did not nullify its pledge of notes and mortgages on Colorado property with state examiner in Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Estoppel. —

Association which induced state examiner (now commissioner) to accept deposit of securities cannot assert invalidity of such deposit. Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Marshaling assets. —

Fact that property covered by mortgage was located in foreign jurisdiction did not affect the power of a court of equity to marshal such assets. Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

That notes and mortgages were forged by officers of association cannot be set up as defense in action for marshaling assets. Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Ratification of deposits. —

Where directors did not object to deposit with state examiner (now commissioner) for considerable time, it will be presumed they ratified deposit. Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

Security on foreign realty. —

Deposit of notes, secured by mortgages on realty in another state, with state examiner (now commissioner) was not void. Dailey v. Federal Bldg. & L. Asso., 1 F. Supp. 231, 1932 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1700 (D. Wyo. 1932).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “an amount established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of fifty dollars ($50.00)” in the second sentence.

§ 13-8-104.
Filing of statement; appointment of agent.

A foreign building and loan association before transacting any business in this state, directly or indirectly, shall file with the state banking commissioner a statement sworn to by the president and secretary of the association. The statement shall show the name and locality of the association, when organized and an itemized account of its actual financial condition showing assets and liabilities, receipts and disbursements for the past twelve (12) months including an itemized statement of its expense account. The statement shall show the amount and number of shares subscribed, the number cancelled and withdrawn during the past year, the number of shares actually in force at the date of the statement, the amount of real estate loans in force and the total number of shares in force in Wyoming, the amount of money accumulated in Wyoming, and all other information as the state banking commissioner may require.

Foreign associations doing business in this state shall file with the state banking commissioner a certified copy of the laws of the state, territory or government under which it is incorporated, relating to the incorporation of the association and pertaining to the regulation, government or control of associations, both foreign and domestic, and of its charter or articles of incorporation, constitution and bylaws and shall appoint an agent for service of process as provided by laws of the state of Wyoming relating to foreign corporations.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 17-121; C.S. 1945, § 36-124; W.S. 1957, § 13-236; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-8-105.
Statement to be renewed annually or as required.

The statements required of foreign associations shall be renewed annually by March 1 as of the preceding December 31 and shall be made at other times as the state banking commissioner may require. Foreign associations shall pay to the state banking commissioner upon filing each annual statement a fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner.

If a foreign association fails to file its annual statement by September 1 of each year, the state banking commissioner shall suspend its license until the statement is made and it is deemed to be doing business unlawfully in this state.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103,§§ 22, 24; R.S. 1931, §§ 17-122, 17-124; C.S. 1945, §§ 36-125, 36-127; Laws 1953, ch. 167,§ 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-237, 13-239; Laws 1973, ch. 245,§ 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 2; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a), substituted “established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of ten dollars ($10.00)” in the second sentence.

§ 13-8-106.
Deposit required.

Each association coming under the provisions of W.S.

13-8-101

relative to foreign associations, shall deposit with the state banking commissioner fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), either in cash, bonds of the United States, any state, county or municipality in this state or mortgages being first liens on improved and productive real estate located within this state of which the liens do not exceed sixty-five percent (65%) of the value of the property accruing to the lien. The securities shall be approved by the state banking commissioner.

The deposit shall be held as security for all claims of residents of this state against the foreign association and liable for all judgment or decrees on it. Securities shall not be released until all shares of the foreign association held by residents of this state have been fully redeemed and its contracts and obligations to residents of this state have been fully discharged. Foreign associations may collect and use the interest on any securities deposited so long as it fulfills its obligations and complies with the provisions of this act. It may also exchange them for other securities of equal value if satisfactory to the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103, § 21; R.S. 1931, § 17-121; C.S. 1945, § 36-124; W.S. 1957, § 13-236; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

13-8-107

; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the next-to-last sentence in subsection (b), see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-8-107.
Licensing of agents, solicitors and salesmen.

Each agent, solicitor or salesman, before transacting or soliciting any business in this state for any association, shall procure annually from the state banking commissioner a license as agent, solicitor or salesman for which a fee established by rule and regulation of the commissioner for each license shall be collected and paid to the commissioner. A license expires on June 30 of each year and is subject to revocation by the state banking commissioner for improper business or conduct.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 103,§ 26; R.S. 1931, § 17-126; C.S. 1945, § 36-129; W.S. 1957, § 13-241; Laws 1973, ch. 245,§ 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 2; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, substituted “established by rule and regulation of the commissioner” for “of two dollars ($2.00)” in the first sentence.